Washington statutes.
RCW 5.52.030

Instrument transmitted by telegraph—Effect.

Any power of attorney, or other instrument in writing, duly proved or acknowledged, and certified so as to be entitled to record may, together with the certificate of its proof or acknowledgment, be sent by telegraph, and telegraphic copy, or duplicate thereof, shall, prima facie, have the same force and effect, in all respects, and may be admitted to record and recorded in the same manner and with like effect as the original.

[Code 1881 s 2354; 1865 p 74 s 13; RRS s 11347.]